Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB782.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1316 heading, (a) introductory paragraph, (c) and (d) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1316. Recovery of [advertising] lobbying and political activity expenses.(a) General rule.--For purposes of rate determinations, no public utility may charge to its consumers as a permissible operating expense for ratemaking purposes any direct or indirect expenditure by the utility for [political advertising] lobbying or political activities or prohibited costs. The commission shall also disallow as operating expense for ratemaking purposes expenditures for other advertising, unless and only to the 12345678910111213141516171819 extent that the commission finds that such advertising is reasonable and meets one or more of the following criteria:* * *(c) Filing of information and materials.--(1) Whenever a public utility proposes a change in rates under section 1308 (relating to voluntary changes in rates), the public utility shall file with the commission a listing of each type of advertising prepared, distributed or presented by the public utility or to be prepared, distributed or presented by the public utility during the test year utilized by the public utility in discharging its burden of proof, and a listing of each type of advertising prepared, distributed or presented by the public utility during the year immediately preceding the test year, as well as an accounting of the expenditures by the public utility for such advertising, to the extent such advertising is proposed to be included as operating expense for ratemaking purposes.(2) Not later than December 31 of each year, a public utility with more than 75,000 customers in this Commonwealth shall file with the commission a report itemizing the costs of lobbying or political activities. The report shall include:(i) costs spent by the parent company or an affiliate of the public utility that are directly billed or allocated to the public utility;(ii) a list of the title, job description and salary of any employee of the public utility who performed work associated with the lobbying or political activity, including the hours attributed to the work;20250HB0782PN0803 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) a list of the title, job description and salary of any employee of the parent company or affiliate of the public utility who performed work associated with the lobbying or political activity, including the hours attributed to the work that were directly billed or allocated to the public utility;(iv) a list of payments that the public utility made to all third-party vendors for expenses associated with the lobbying or political activity, including unredacted billing amounts, billing dates, payees and an explanation of each expenditure in detail sufficient to describe the purpose of the cost; and(v) any other information the commission considers relevant.(3) The filing requirements imposed by this subsection shall not be construed to limit the right of any party to discovery under this or any other provision of law.(d) [Definition.--As used in this section the term "political advertising" means any advertising] Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Lobbying or political activity." Action taken at the State or municipal government level in connection with:(1) influencing legislation;(2) participating or intervening in any political campaign on behalf of or in opposition to a candidate for public office;(3) an attempt to influence a segment of the general public with respect to an election, legislative matter, 20250HB0782PN0803 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 executive decision or referendum;(4) political advertising; or(5) supporting public policy research, analysis, preparation or planning."Political advertising." Advertising for the purpose of influencing public opinion with respect to any legislative, administrative action or candidate election or with respect to any controversial issue to be decided by public voting. The term includes money spent for lobbying but not money spent for appearances before regulatory or other governmental bodies in connection with a public utility's existing or proposed operations."Prohibited costs." An expense for any of the following:(1) membership, dues, sponsorships or contributions to a business or industry trade association, group or related entity exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501 (relating to e xemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) ; (2) unless approved or ordered by the commission, advertising, marketing, communication or other related expense identified by the commission that seeks to influence public opinion or create goodwill toward a public utility;(3) travel, lodging or food and beverage expense for the board of directors and officers of a public utility or the board of directors and officers of a parent company of a public utility;(4) entertainment or gifts;(5) any owned, leased or chartered aircraft for the board of directors and officers of a public utility or the parent company of a public utility; or20250HB0782PN0803 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) investor relations.Section 2. Title 66 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2816. Membership in regional transmission organization.(a) Membership.--An electric distribution company shall be a member of a regional transmission organization.(b) Filing of report.--On or before February 1 each year, an electric distribution company shall submit to the commission a report on any recorded vote cast by the electric distribution company or, subject to subsection (c), an affiliate of the electric distribution company at a meeting of a regional transmission organization during the immediately preceding calendar year.(c) Contents of report.--The report under subsection (b) shall include:(1) all recorded votes cast by the electric distribution company, regardless of whether the vote is otherwise disclosed;(2) all votes cast by an affiliate of the electric distribution company, if the electric distribution company itself did not vote on the matter; and(3) a brief description explaining how each vote cast by the electric distribution company or its affiliate is in the interest of the public.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliate." A corporation or person with an affiliated interest as defined in section 2101 (relating to definition of affiliated interest)."Meeting." A committee, user group, task force or other part 20250HB0782PN0803 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a regional transmission organization in which votes are taken."Recorded vote." A vote that is tabulated, either individually or as part of a sector, for any purpose at a meeting, regardless of:(1) whether the vote represents a final position of any person casting the vote; or(2) the decision-making authority of those voting."Regional transmission organization." An entity that qualifies as a regional transmission organization under 18 CFR 35.34 (relating to regional transmission organizations).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0782PN0803 - 6 - 123456789101112